Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.385

Resignation of registered agent.

Any registered agent in this state appointed by a foreign corporation may resign as such agent by executing and delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of resignation in accordance with RCW 23.95.445.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4124; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 77.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.